Mississippi, session 2026, HB1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-191.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the first primary shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of August preceding any regular or general election; and the second primary shall be held four (4) weeks thereafter.  The candidate that receives a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be the party nominee.  If no candidate receives a majority vote at the election, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later.  The candidate who receives the most votes in the second primary election shall be the party nominee.  However, if no candidate receives a majority vote at the first primary, and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, then those candidates receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest vote shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later, and whoever receives the most votes cast in the second primary election shall be the party nominee. (2)  In any year in which there is a date preceding a regular or general election which is recognized across the country as Super Tuesday, the first primary election shall be held on the day recognized as Super Tuesday.  If more than one (1) day is recognized as Super Tuesday during any year, the first primary election shall be held on the earliest day designated as Super Tuesday.  As soon as the date of Super Tuesday in a given year has been identified, the Secretary of State shall certify that date as the day of the primary election in Mississippi for that year.  The second primary shall be held four (4) weeks thereafter.  The candidate that receives a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be the party nominee.  If no candidate receives a majority vote at the election, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later.  The candidate who receives the most votes in the second primary election shall be the party nominee.  However, if no candidate receives a majority vote at the first primary, and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, then those candidates receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest vote shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later, and whoever receives the most votes cast in the second primary election shall be the party nominee. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-303.  When two (2) or more political parties or political organizations are holding primary elections, each shall be conducted entirely independent of the other but at the same time. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.